Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-208.05
Insurance companies; organization; failure to complete; proceedings authorized.

(1) If a corporation does not qualify for a certificate of authority within one year from the date it receives its permit to complete its organization or if an agent of the corporation employed to solicit subscriptions or applications has violated the insurance laws of the state, the Director of Insurance may revoke such permit and order the assets of the corporation to be distributed to the persons or legal entities entitled thereto or proceed against the corporation as an insolvent insurance company in the manner authorized and directed by the Nebraska Insurers Supervision, Rehabilitation, and Liquidation Act.

(2) If any corporation does not qualify to receive its certificate of authority within two years from the date it receives its permit to complete organization, the Director of Insurance shall order the assets of the corporation to be distributed to the persons or legal entities entitled thereto or proceed against the corporation as an insolvent insurance company in the manner authorized and directed by the act.

Laws 1957, c. 178, § 6, p. 614;

Laws 1989, LB 92, § 52;

Laws 1989, LB 319, § 67.

Nebraska Insurers Supervision, Rehabilitation, and Liquidation Act, see section 44-4862.